Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 1. Emergency Management

§ 1.
Purpose and policy.

Because of the increasing possibility of the occurrence of disasters or emergencies of unprecedented size and destructiveness resulting from all-hazards and in order to ensure that preparation of this State will be adequate to deal with such disasters or emergencies; to provide for the common defense; to protect the public peace, health, and safety; and to preserve the lives and property of the people of the State, it is found and declared to be necessary:

to create a State emergency management agency, and to authorize the creation of local and regional organizations for emergency management;

to confer upon the Governor and upon the executive heads or legislative branches of the towns and cities of the State the emergency powers provided pursuant to this chapter;

to provide for the rendering of mutual aid among the towns and cities of the State; with other states and Canada; and with the federal government with respect to the carrying out of emergency management functions; and

to authorize the establishment of organizations and the taking of steps as necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

It is further declared to be the purpose of this chapter and the policy of the State that all emergency management functions of this State be coordinated to the maximum extent with the comparable functions of the federal government including its various departments and agencies, of other states and localities, and of private agencies of every type, to the end that the most effective preparation and use may be made of the nation’s resources and facilities for dealing with any emergencies resulting from all-hazards.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2021, No. 20

, § 111.

§ 2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“All-hazards” means any natural disaster, health or disease-related emergency, accident, civil insurrection, use of weapons of mass destruction, terrorist or criminal incident, radiological incident, significant event, and designated special event, any of which may occur individually, simultaneously, or in combination and that poses a threat or may pose a threat, as determined by the Commissioner or designee, to property or public safety in Vermont.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Public Safety.

“Director” means the Director of Vermont Division of Emergency Management.

“Emergency functions” include services provided by the Department of Public Safety, firefighting services, police services, sheriff’s department services, medical and health services, rescue, engineering, emergency warning services, communications, evacuation of persons, emergency welfare services, protection of critical infrastructure, emergency transportation, temporary restoration of public utility services, other functions related to civilian protection, and all other activities necessary or incidental to the preparation for and carrying out of these functions.

“EPCRA” means the federal Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 11001-11050 (1986).

“Emergency management” means the preparation for and implementation of all emergency functions, other than the functions for which the U.S. Armed Forces or other federal agencies are primarily responsible, to prevent, plan for, mitigate, and support response and recovery efforts from all-hazards. Emergency management includes the equipping, exercising, and training designed to ensure that this State and its communities are prepared to deal with all-hazards.

“Hazard mitigation” means any action taken to reduce or eliminate the threat to persons or property from all-hazards.

“Hazardous chemical or substance” means:

Any chemical covered by 42 U.S.C. §§ 11021 and 11022 and defined in 29 C.F.R. § 1910.1200(c) or in

18 V.S.A. § 1722

.

Any substance as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 9601(14) or designated hazardous by the administrator of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 9602(a) or 11002(a)(2).

Any hazardous material pursuant to

5 V.S.A. § 2001

.

Fungicides, herbicides, insecticides, or rodenticides as defined in

6 V.S.A. § 911

.

Any hazardous waste or material as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 6602

.

Any of the dangerous substances defined in section 2799 of this title.

“Hazardous chemical or substance incident” means any mishap or occurrence involving hazardous chemicals or substances that may pose a threat to persons or property.

“Homeland security” means the preparation for and carrying out of all emergency functions, other than the functions for which the U.S. Armed Forces or other federal agencies are primarily responsible, to prevent, minimize, or repair injury and damage resulting from or caused by enemy attack, sabotage, or other hostile action.

“Radiological incident” means any mishap or occurrence involving radiological activity that may pose a threat to persons or property.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 3, 1972;

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2021, No. 20

, § 112.

§ 3.
Vermont Emergency Management Division.

There is hereby created within the Department of Public Safety a division to be known as the Vermont Emergency Management Division.

There shall be a Director of Vermont Emergency Management who shall be in immediate charge of the Division. The Director shall be appointed by the Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor. The Director shall serve at the pleasure of the Commissioner and shall hold no other State office. The Director shall perform all the following duties:

coordinate the activities of all emergency management organizations within the State;

maintain liaison and cooperation with emergency management agencies and organizations of the federal government, other states, and Canada;

perform additional duties and responsibilities required pursuant to this chapter and prescribed by the Governor.

The Commissioner, subject to the approval of the Governor, shall delegate to the several departments and agencies of the State government appropriate emergency management responsibilities and review and coordinate the emergency management activities of the departments and agencies with each other and with the activities of the districts and neighboring states, the neighboring Canadian province of Quebec, and the federal government.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 125

, § 17, eff. July 2, 1965;

1985, No. 4

, eff. March 9, 1985;

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 3a.
Emergency Management Division; duties; budget.

In addition to other duties required by law, the Division of Emergency Management shall:

Establish and maintain a comprehensive State emergency management strategy that includes an emergency management plan; establish and define regional emergency management committees; and prepare an all-hazards mitigation plan in cooperation with other State, regional, and local agencies in compliance with adopted federal standards for emergency management. The strategy shall be designed to protect the lives and property, including domestic animals, of persons within this State who might be threatened as the result of all-hazards, and shall align State coordination structures, capabilities, and resources into a unified and multidisciplined all-hazards approach to incident management.

Assist the State Emergency Response Commission, the local emergency planning committees, the regional emergency management committees, and the municipally established local organizations referred to in section 6 of this title in carrying out their designated emergency functions, including developing, implementing, and coordinating emergency plans.

Each fiscal year, the Division of Emergency Management, in collaboration with State and local agencies, the management of the nuclear reactor, the legislative bodies of the municipalities in the emergency planning zone where the nuclear reactor is located, the Windham Regional Planning Commission, and any other municipality or emergency planning zone entity required by the State to support the Radiological Emergency Response Plan, shall develop the budget for expenditures from the Radiological Emergency Response Plan Fund. The expenditure budget shall include all costs for evacuation notification systems.

From the Fund, each town within the emergency planning zone shall receive an annual base payment of no less than $5,000.00 for radiological emergency response-related expenditures from the Radiological Emergency Response Plan Fund. Additional expenditures by municipalities in the emergency planning zone, the Windham Regional Planning Commission, and any other municipality or emergency planning entity defined by the State as required to support the Plan shall be determined during the budget development process established by subsection (b) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 14, 1994;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2005, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 68a;

2021, No. 52

, § 17.

§ 4.
Repealed. 1996, No. 188, § 4.

§ 5.
Public safety districts.

The Governor shall divide the State into public safety districts, one to correspond to each Vermont State Police troop area, as defined by the Commissioner. Each district shall be a reasonably self-sustaining, operating emergency management unit.

The emergency management executive in each district shall be known as the district coordinator. The district coordinator shall be appointed by the Commissioner and shall serve during the pleasure of the Commissioner. The district coordinator shall discharge emergency management powers within his or her district. Each public safety district shall maintain on file an all-hazards incident response plan in cooperation with any local emergency planning committee (LEPC) in that district and other State and local agencies.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 23

, § 1, eff. March 6, 1959;

1985, No. 4

, eff. March 9, 1985;

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1995, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 6.
Local organization for emergency management.

Each town and city of this State is hereby authorized and directed to establish a local organization for emergency management in accordance with the State emergency management plan and program. The executive officer or legislative branch of the town or city is authorized to appoint a town or city emergency management director who shall have direct responsibility for the organization, administration, and coordination of the local organization for emergency management, subject to the direction and control of the executive officer or legislative branch. If the town or city that has not adopted the town manager form of government in accordance with 24 V.S.A. chapter 37 and the executive officer or legislative branch of the town or city has not appointed an emergency management director, the executive officer or legislative branch shall be the town or city emergency management director. The town or city emergency management director may appoint an emergency management coordinator and other staff as necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Each local organization for emergency management shall perform emergency management functions within the territorial limits of the town or city within which it is organized and, in addition, shall conduct such functions outside of the territorial limits as may be required pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and in accord with rules adopted by the Governor.

Each local organization shall develop and maintain an all-hazards emergency management plan in accordance with guidance set forth by the Division of Emergency Management.

Regional emergency management committees shall be established by the Division of Emergency Management.

Regional emergency management committees shall coordinate emergency planning and preparedness activities to improve their regions’ ability to prepare for, respond to, and recover from all disasters.

The Division of Emergency Management shall establish geographic boundaries and guidance documents for regional emergency planning committees in coordination with regional planning commissions and mutual aid associations.

A regional emergency management committee shall consist of voting and nonvoting members.

Voting members. The local emergency management director or designee and one representative from each town and city in the region shall serve as the voting members of the committee. A representative from a town or city shall be a member of the town’s or city’s emergency services community and shall be appointed by the town’s or city’s executive or legislative branch.

Nonvoting members. Nonvoting members may include representatives from the following organizations serving within the region: fire departments, emergency medical services, law enforcement, media, transportation, regional planning commissions, hospitals, the Department of Health’s district office, the Division of Emergency Management, organizations serving vulnerable populations, and any other interested public or private individual or organization.

Voting members shall annually elect a chair and vice chair of the committee from the voting membership. The chair shall develop a meeting schedule, agenda, and facilitate each meeting. The vice chair shall fill in for the chair during the chair’s absence.

Committees shall develop and maintain a regional plan, consistent with guidance provided by the Division of Emergency Management in coordination with regional planning commissions, that describes regional coordination and regionally available resources.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 14, 1994;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2021, No. 20

, § 113;

2021, No. 52

, § 12.

§ 7.
Mobile support units.

Organization. The Commissioner is authorized to create and establish mobile support units as necessary to reinforce emergency management organizations in stricken areas and with due consideration of the plans of the federal government, the government of Canada, and other states. A mobile support unit shall be subject to call to duty and shall perform these functions in this State, in Canada, or in other states in accord with its charter and rules adopted by the Governor and with the terms of this chapter.

Personnel; powers and immunities, compensation.

Personnel of mobile support units while engaged in emergency management, whether within or outside the State, shall:

if they are employees of the State, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment;

if they are employees of a political subdivision of the State, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment; and

if they are not employees of the State, or a political subdivision of the State, be entitled to appropriate compensation as fixed by the Commissioner with the approval of the Governor, and to the same rights and immunities as are provided by law for the employees of this State.

All personnel of mobile support units, while engaged in emergency management, shall be subject to the operational control of the authority in charge of emergency management activities in the area in which they are serving and shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses.

Reimbursement of municipalities. The State shall reimburse a political subdivision of the State for the compensation paid and actual and necessary travel, subsistence, and maintenance expenses of employees of the political subdivision of the State while serving as members of a mobile support unit; for all payments of death, disability, or injury of the employees incurred in the course of such duty; and for all losses of or damage to supplies and equipment of the political subdivision of the State resulting from the operation of the mobile support unit.

Aid from other states. Whenever a mobile support unit of another state provides aid in this State pursuant to the orders of the governor of its home state and upon the request of the Governor, this State shall reimburse the other state for the compensation paid and actual and necessary travel, subsistence, and maintenance expenses of the personnel of the mobile support unit while providing the aid, and for all payments for death, disability, or injury of the unit’s personnel incurred in the course of providing the aid, and for all losses of or damage to supplies and equipment of the other state or a political subdivision of that state resulting from the provision of aid, provided that the laws of the other state contain provisions substantially similar to this section or that substantially similar provisions are contained in a reciprocal mutual-aid agreement or compact or that the federal government has authorized or agreed to make reimbursements for the mutual aid on a basis that is substantially similar to the requirements of this section.

Aid to other states. No personnel of mobile support units of this State shall be ordered by the Governor to operate in any other state unless the laws of the other state contain provisions substantially similar to this section or unless the reciprocal mutual aid agreements or compacts include provisions providing for such reimbursements or unless the reimbursements will be made by the federal government by law or agreement.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2021, No. 20

, § 114.

§ 8.
General powers of Governor.

The Governor shall have general direction and control of the emergency management agency and shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

In performing the duties under this chapter, the Governor is further authorized and empowered:

Orders and rules. To make, amend, and rescind the necessary orders and rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter with due consideration of the plans of the federal government.

Plans.

To prepare a comprehensive plan and program for the emergency management of this State to be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plans of the federal government, the Canadian government, and other states to the fullest possible extent.

To coordinate the preparation of plans and programs for emergency management with public safety districts, local emergency planning committees, regional planning commissions, and by the municipalities of this State. The plans shall be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plans and program of this State to the fullest possible extent.

Inventories, training, mobilization. In accordance with the plan and program for the emergency management of the State:

to ascertain the requirements of the State or the municipalities for food or clothing or other necessities of life in any all-hazards event and to plan for and procure supplies, medicines, materials, and equipment for the purposes set forth in this chapter;

to make surveys of the industries, resources, and facilities within the State as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, provided that no inventory or record of privately owned firearms shall be made under the provisions of this chapter; and

to institute training programs and public information programs, and to take all other preparatory steps, including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management organizations in advance of actual disaster, to ensure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of emergency management personnel in time of need.

Cooperation with the President and others.

To cooperate with the President and the heads of the U.S. Armed Forces, and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, and with the officers and agencies of other states in matters pertaining to the emergency management of the State and nation.

To take any measures, consistent with the Vermont Constitution, that the Governor deems proper to implement any request for the president and the appropriate federal officers and agencies, for any action looking to emergency management, including the direction or control of mobilization of emergency management and homeland security forces, tests and exercises, warnings and signals for drills or emergencies, shutting off water mains, gas mains, electric power connections and the suspension of all other utility services, the conduct of civilians and the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrians and vehicular traffic during, prior, and subsequent to drills or attack, public meetings or gatherings, and the evacuation and reception of the civilian population.

Services and facilities. To utilize the services and facilities of existing officers and agencies of the State and of the counties and municipalities of the State. All officers and agencies shall cooperate with and extend services and facilities to the Governor as the Governor may request.

Law enforcement. To take action and give directions to State and local law enforcement officers and agencies as may be reasonable and necessary to secure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and with the orders and rules made pursuant to this chapter.

Delegation of authority. To delegate any authority vested in the Governor under this chapter to the Commissioner or designee.

Mutual aid agreements with other states. On behalf of this State, to enter into reciprocal aid agreements under this chapter and pursuant to compacts with other states and the federal government or a province of a foreign country under such terms as the Congress of the United States may prescribe. These mutual aid arrangements shall be limited to the furnishing or exchange of food, clothing, medicine, and other supplies; engineering services; emergency housing; police services; National Guard or State Guard units while under the control of the State; health; medical and related services; fire fighting, rescue, transportation, and construction services and equipment; personnel necessary to provide or conduct these services; and other supplies, equipment, facilities, personnel, and services as needed; and the reimbursement of costs and expenses for equipment, supplies, personnel, and similar items for mobile support units, fire fighting, and police units and health units. The mutual aid agreements shall be made on such terms and conditions as the Governor deems necessary.

Mutual aid among municipalities. To sponsor, develop, and approve mutual aid plans and agreements among the towns and cities of the State, similar to the mutual aid arrangements referred to in this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2021, No. 20

, § 115.

§ 9.
Emergency powers of Governor.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, in the event of an all-hazards event in or directed upon the United States or Canada that causes or may cause substantial damage or injury to persons or property within the State in any manner, the Governor may proclaim a state of emergency within the entire State or any portion or portions of the State. Thereafter, the Governor shall have and may exercise for as long as the Governor determines the emergency to exist the following additional powers within such area or areas:

To enforce all laws and rules relating to emergency management and to assume direct operational control of all emergency management personnel and helpers in the affected area or areas.

To formulate and execute plans and rules for the control of traffic and to coordinate the activities of the departments or agencies of the State and of the political subdivisions of the State concerned directly or indirectly with public highways and streets, in a manner that will best effectuate the plans.

To prescribe the maximum rates of speed at which motor vehicles may be operated on any road, highway, or street in the State; prescribe the sizes and weights of such motor vehicles; suspend the application of any statute or rule levying or assessing any license, insofar as the statute or rule relates to the entry into or the privilege of operation in this State of any motor vehicle, including busses or house trailers, registered in any other state and with respect to which a valid and unexpired license has been issued by the other state.

To employ such measures and give such directions to the State or local boards of health as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

To utilize the services and facilities of existing officers and agencies of the State and of the cities and towns of the State; and all such officers and agencies shall cooperate with and extend their services and facilities to the Governor as he or she may request.

To use and employ within the State, from time to time, and as he or she may deem expedient, any of the property, services, and resources of the State, for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

To establish agencies and offices and to appoint executive, technical, clerical, and other personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Upon the declaration of an emergency as authorized in federal legislation that includes the State of Vermont, to cooperate with the President of the United States, the U.S. Armed Forces, with other federal departments, agencies, and independent establishments, and other states in matters pertaining to emergency management; and in connection therewith to take such action, not inconsistent with the Constitution and laws of the State, that he or she may deem proper to carry into effect any request of the President, the Secretary of Defense, the Secretary of Homeland Security, the Secretary of Health and Human Services, and the Director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency.

To order the evacuation of persons living or working within all or a portion of an area for which a state of emergency has been proclaimed.

As provided in

30 V.S.A. § 248

(l), in consultation with the Chair of the Public Utility Commission and the Commissioner of Public Service or their designees, to waive the prohibitions contained in

30 V.S.A. § 248

upon site preparation for or construction of an electric transmission facility or a generating facility necessary to ensure the stability or reliability of the electric system or a natural gas facility. Waivers issued under this subdivision shall be subject to conditions required by the Governor and shall be valid for the duration of the declared emergency plus 180 days, or such lesser overall term as determined by the Governor. Upon the expiration of a waiver under this subdivision, if a certificate of public good has not been issued by the Public Utility Commission under 30 V.S.A. § 248, the Commission shall require the removal, relocation, or alteration of the facilities, subject to the waiver, as the Commission finds will best promote the general good of the State.

In consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources or designee, to authorize the Agency to issue temporary emergency permits, with appropriate conditions to minimize significant adverse environmental impacts, after limited or no opportunity for public comment, allowing site preparation for, construction of, or operation of an electric transmission facility or a generating facility necessary to ensure the stability or reliability of the electric system or a natural gas facility. A permit issued under this subdivision shall be subject to conditions required by the Governor and shall be valid for the duration of the declared emergency plus 180 days, or such lesser overall term as determined by the Governor. Upon the expiration of a temporary emergency permit under this subdivision, if any applicable permits have not been issued by the Secretary or the Commissioner of Environmental Conservation, the Secretary may seek enforcement under applicable law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 23

, § 2, eff. March 6, 1959;

1983, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 16, 1984;

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2003, No. 82

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2021, No. 20

, § 116.

§ 10.
Request to Governor by municipal authorities.

The all-hazards event provisions of this chapter shall not be brought into action unless the municipal director of emergency management, a member of the legislative body of the municipality, the city or town manager, or the mayor of a city that is within the area affected by an all-hazards event shall declare an emergency and request the Governor to find that a state of emergency exists and the Governor so finds, or unless the Governor declares a state of emergency under section 9 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 11.
Additional emergency powers.

In the event of an all-hazards event, the Governor may exercise any or all of the following additional powers:

To authorize any department or agency of the State to lease or lend, on such terms and conditions and for such period as he or she deems necessary to promote the public welfare and protect the interests of the State, any real or personal property of the State government, or authorize the temporary transfer or employment of personnel of the State government to or by the U.S. Armed Forces.

To enter into a contract on behalf of the State for the lease or loan, on such terms and conditions and for such period as he or she deems necessary to promote the public welfare and protect the interests of the State, of any real or personal property of the State government, or the temporary transfer or employment of personnel thereof to any town or city of the State. The chief executive or legislative branch of the town or city is authorized for and in the name of the town or city to enter into the contract with the Governor for the leasing or lending of the property and personnel, and the chief executive or legislative branch of the town or city may equip, maintain, utilize, and operate such property except newspapers and other publications, radio stations, places of worship and assembly, and other facilities for the exercise of constitutional freedom, and employ necessary personnel in accordance with the purposes for which such contract is executed; and may do all things and perform all acts necessary to effectuate the purpose for which the contract was entered into.

To seize, take, or condemn property for the protection of the public or at the request of the President, or his or her authorized representatives including:

All means of transportation;

All stocks of fuel of whatever nature;

Food, clothing, equipment, materials, medicines, and all supplies;

Facilities, including buildings and plants; provided that neither this nor any other authority in this chapter shall be deemed to authorize the eviction of a householder and his or her family from their own home.

To sell, lend, give, or distribute all or any such property among the inhabitants of the State and to account to the State Treasurer for any funds received for such property.

To make compensation for the property seized, taken, or condemned on the following basis:

In case property is taken for temporary use, the Governor, at the time of the taking, shall fix the amount of compensation to be paid for the property, and in case the property is returned to the owner in a damaged condition or shall not be returned to the owner, the Governor shall fix the amount of compensation to be paid for the damage or failure to return. Whenever the Governor deems it advisable for the State to take title to property taken under this section, the Governor shall forthwith cause the owner of the property to be notified of the taking in writing by registered mail, postage prepaid, and forthwith cause to be filed a copy of the notice with the Secretary of State.

Any owner of property of which possession has been taken under the provisions of this chapter to whom no award has been made or who is dissatisfied with the amount awarded him or her by the Governor may file a petition in the Superior Court within the county wherein the property was situated at the time of taking to have the amount to which he or she is entitled by way of damages or compensation determined, and either the petitioner or the State shall have the right to have the amount of such damages or compensation fixed after hearing by three disinterested appraisers appointed by the court, and who shall operate under substantive and administrative procedure to be established by the Superior judges. If the petitioner is dissatisfied with the award of the appraisers, he or she may appeal the award to the Superior Court and thereafter have a trial by jury to determine the amount of the damages or compensation. The court costs of a proceeding brought under this section by the owner of the property shall be paid by the State, and the fees and expenses of any attorney for the owner shall also be paid by the State after allowances by the court in which the petition is brought in an amount determined by the court. The statute of limitations shall not apply to proceedings brought by owners of property under this section for and during the time that any court having jurisdiction over the proceedings is prevented from holding its usual and stated sessions due to conditions resulting from emergencies described in this chapter.

To perform and exercise other functions, powers, and duties as necessary to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 23

, § 3, eff. March 6, 1959;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1985, No. 4

, eff. March 9, 1985;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2021, No. 20

, § 117.

§ 12.
Repealed. 2005, No. 209 (Adj. Sess.), § 35.

§ 13.
Termination of emergencies.

The Governor:

May terminate by proclamation the emergencies provided for in sections 9 and 11 of this title; provided, however, that no emergencies shall be terminated prior to the termination of such emergency as provided in federal law.

May declare the state of emergency terminated in any area affected by an all-hazards event.

Upon receiving notice that a majority of the legislative body of a municipality affected by a natural disaster no longer desires that the state of emergency continue within its municipality, shall declare the state of emergency terminated within that particular municipality. Upon the termination of the state of emergency, the functions as set forth in section 9 of this title shall cease, and the local authorities shall resume control.

HISTORY:

Amended

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 14.
Repealed. 2005, No. 209 (Adj. Sess.), § 35.

§ 15.
Return of property.

Whenever the need for the purposes of this chapter of any real or personal property acquired under this chapter shall terminate, the Governor may dispose of such property on such terms and conditions as he or she deems appropriate, but to the extent feasible and practicable the Governor shall give to the former owner of any property so disposed of an opportunity to reacquire it:

at its then fair value as determined by the Governor; or

if it is to be disposed of, other than at a public sale of which the Governor shall give reasonable notice, at less than such value, at the highest price any other person is willing to pay for the property.

The Governor need not provide an opportunity to reacquire property in the case of items that lose their identity in use or to property having a fair value of less than $500.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 118.

§ 16.
Orders and rules.

The towns and cities of the State and other agencies designated or appointed by the Governor are authorized and empowered to make, amend, and rescind orders and rules as necessary for emergency management purposes and to supplement the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter. Orders and rules adopted pursuant to this section shall not be inconsistent with any orders and rules adopted by the Governor or by any State agency exercising a power delegated to it by him or her.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2021, No. 20

, § 119.

§ 17.
Gift, grant, or loan.

Federal. Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer of the federal government offers to the State, or through the State to any town or city within Vermont, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan for purposes of emergency management, the State, acting through the Governor in coordination with the Department of Public Safety, or such town or city acting with the consent of the Governor and through its executive officer or legislative branch, may accept the offer, and upon such acceptance, the Governor or the executive officer or legislative branch of the political subdivision may authorize any officer of the State or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive the services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the State or the political subdivisions, and subject to the terms of the offer and rules, if any, of the agency making the offer. Whenever a federal grant is contingent upon a State or local contribution, or both, the Department of Public Safety and the political subdivision shall determine whether the grant shall be accepted and, if accepted, the respective shares to be contributed by the State and town or city concerned.

Private. Whenever any person, firm, or corporation offers to the State or to any town or city in Vermont services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan, for purposes of emergency management, the State, acting through the Governor, or the political subdivision, acting through its executive officer or legislative branch, may accept the offer, and upon such acceptance, the Governor or executive officer or legislative branch of the political subdivision may authorize any officer of the State or the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive the services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the State or the political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 4

, eff. March 9, 1985;

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2021, No. 20

, § 120.

§ 18.
Personnel requirements and nonsubversion.

No person shall be employed or associated in any capacity in any emergency management organization established under this chapter who advocates a change by force or violence in the constitutional form of the government of the United States or in this State or the overthrow of any government in the United States by force or violence, or who has been convicted of or is under indictment or information charging any subversive act against the United States. Each person who is employed by an emergency management organization established under this chapter and whose access to facilities, materials, or information requires a security clearance, as determined by the Commissioner, shall be subject to a background check and a criminal history record check.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.